Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4106.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1704, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1704. Grand larceny is larceny committed in either of
the following cases:
1. When the property taken is of a value of One Thousand
Dollars ($1,000.00) Nine Hundred Dollars ($900.00) or greater; or
2. When such property, although not of a value of One Thousand
Dollars ($1,000.00) Nine Hundred Dollars ($900.00) or greater, is
taken from the person of another.
Larceny in other cases is petit larceny.

ENGR. H. B. NO. 4106 Page 1

SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1706, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1706. A. Petit larceny shall be punishable by a fine
of not less than Ten Dollars ($10.00) or more than Five Hundred
Dollars ($500.00), or imprisonment in the county jail not to six (6)
months, or by both such fine and imprisonment, at the discretion of
the court.
B. When three or more separate offenses of petit larceny are
committed within a one-hundred-eighty-day period and the aggregate
value of the property taken exceeds Nine Hundred Dollars ($900.00),
the person shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class D3 felony
offense and shall be punished by imprisonment as provided for in
subsections B through F of Section 20P of this title, or by a fine
not exceeding One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or by both such fine
and imprisonment.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.








ENGR. H. B. NO. 4106 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 25th day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the _____ day of _______, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate
















ENGR. H. B. NO. 4106 Page 3